Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2807.03
Brand name, defined.

Brand name means the proprietary or trade name selected by the manufacturer, distributor, or packager for a drug product and placed upon the labeling of such product at the time of packaging.

Laws 2017, LB481, § 5.